Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB937.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1722-A.2(d) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1722-A.2. Sports, Marketing and Tourism Account.* * *(d) Use of funds.--* * *(2.1) For financial assistance awarded for the purpose or in expectation of hospitality, excluding hospitality that is generally available to the public at no charge, as provided in paragraph (1)(x) or (2), the department shall establish, update on a monthly basis and maintain a log of Commonwealth officials and employees, guests of those officials or employees and guests otherwise invited by or at the direction of the department, who are recipients of the hospitality. The department shall post the log on the department's publicly accessible Internet website and shall update the posting monthly. At a minimum, the information made available on the department's Internet website shall include, for each recipient:(i) First and last name.(ii) City and state of residential address.(iii) Employer name, city and state.(iv) Work title, occupation or profession.(v) Date or date range of hospitality.(vi) Name of event.(vii) Description of hospitality.20250SB0937PN1064 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031 (viii) Estimated value of hospitality.(ix) Reason for department's invitation.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0937PN1064 - 3 - 1234